Missouri, session 2026, SB1026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 195.900, to read as
follows:
195.900. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Cannabinoids", ligands that are either plant-
derived, synthetic, or semisynthetic, and have an affinity
for and activity at cannabinoid receptors;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(3) "Intoxicating cannabinoids":
(a) Any cannabinoid, however derived or created, that
has an intoxicating effect when consumed or otherwise
ingested, irrespective of whether the cannabinoid was
created or developed through natural means or through
chemical conversion, isomerization, synthetic derivation,
heat, or any other process by which molecules may be
manipulated, including, without limitation, THC-A; and
(b) Any cannabinoid, semisynthetic or synthetic
cannabinoid, or precursor to an intoxicating cannabinoid

SB 1026 2
that may become intoxicating when heated, decarboxylated, or
otherwise manipulated, excluding, without limitation,
cannabidiol (CBD).
2. Any person or entity selling, or offering for sale,
in this state any intoxicating cannabinoid shall not be
prohibited from doing so by any law regulating or
restricting the sale of any form of Cannabis sativa L.;
provided, that such products are:
(1) Sold only to adults twenty-one years of age or
older upon age verification;
(2) Compliant with testing and safety regulations
promulgated by the department;
(3) Compliant with packaging and labeling regulations
promulgated by the department in order to protect minors; and
(4) Compliant with other regulations promulgated by
the department under subsection 4 of this section.
3. (1) Any person or entity selling an intoxicating
cannabinoid in this state shall annually register with the
department prior to the sale of such products. Any person
or entity selling intoxicating cannabinoids in this state
prior to August 28, 2026, shall have forty-five days to
register with the department, during which time such person
or entity may continue to sell intoxicating cannabinoids
pending registration with the department. All other persons
or entities selling intoxicating cannabinoids on or after
August 28, 2026, shall be required to register with the
department prior to engaging in such sale in this state.
(2) Each entity registering with the department shall
remit an annual one thousand dollar registration fee to the
department, to be used for purposes of enforcement and
administration of the provisions of this section.

SB 1026 3
4. The department shall promulgate all rules and
regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this
section, including, but not limited to, rules designed to
protect public health and safety, establish potency limits,
implement recall procedures of dangerous products, establish
advertising standards, and create mechanisms for compliance
and enforcement. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓